Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-505
Year-round operation of public schools; notice to State Board of Education.

No public school district shall convert to a year-round operation without notifying the State Board of Education of compliance with sections 79-503 to 79-505.

Laws 1973, LB 65, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-201.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 258.